Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 1. Liability of Owners of Land Used For Recreation Purposes

§ 34-19-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Land” means land, including state land, roads, water, watercourses, private ways and buildings, structures, and machinery or equipment when attached to the realty;

“Owner” means the possessor of a fee interest, a tenant, lessee, including a lessee of state lands, occupant or person in control of the premises;

“Recreational purpose” includes, but is not limited to, any one (1) or more of the following: hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking, pleasure driving, nature study, water skiing, winter sports, bicycling, mountain biking, horseback riding and other equine activities as defined in W.S. 1-1-122(a)(iv), noncommercial aviation activities and viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic or scientific sites;

“Charge” means the admission price or fee asked in return for invitation or permission to enter or go upon the land;

“This act” means W.S.

34-19-101

through

34-19-106

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.1; Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 2; 2013 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, inserted “bicycling, mountain biking, horseback riding and other equine activities as defined in W.S. 1-1-122(a)(iv), noncommercial aviation activities” in (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicable to equine activities. —

The definition of “recreational purpose” is open-ended and does not evince a legislative intent to exclude equine activities from the recreational purpose provisions of the Landowner Liability Act. Addakai v. Witt, 2001 WY 85, 31 P.3d 70,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. Oct. 23, 2001).

Stated

in

§ 34-19-102.
Landowner's duty of care or duty to give warnings.

Except as specifically recognized by or provided in W.S.

34-19-105

, an owner of land owes no duty of care to keep the premises safe for entry or use by others for recreational purposes, or to give any warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure or activity on such premises to persons entering for recreational purposes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 9, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.2; Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 2.

The duty of care owed by the owner of land to an invitee

is to use ordinary and reasonable care to keep the premises reasonably safe for his visit and to warn him of any hidden danger. Smith v. United States, 383 F. Supp. 1076, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6035 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 546 F.2d 872, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 5711 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

Duty of invitee. —

Even though a person is an invitee this does not relieve him of the duty to exercise ordinary care for his own safety under all the attendant facts and circumstances. Smith v. United States, 383 F. Supp. 1076, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6035 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 546 F.2d 872, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 5711 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

Duty of care of national park service. —

Where the national park service of the department of the interior of the United States of America was foreclosed by its own regulation from charging any fee to plaintiff, it owed no duty of care to plaintiff to keep the premises, a national park, safe for his entry or his use for recreational purposes, nor did it owe any duty to give him any warning of any dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the premises because he was entering for recreational purposes. Smith v. United States, 383 F. Supp. 1076, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6035 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 546 F.2d 872, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 5711 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public rights of recreational boating, fishing, wading, or the like in inland stream the bed of which is privately owned, 6 ALR4th 1030.

Liability of owner of store, office, or similar place of business to invitee falling on tracked-in water or snow, 20 ALR4th 438.

Modern status of rules conditioning landowner's liability upon status of injured party as invitee, licensee, or trespasser, 22 ALR4th 294.

Liability to adult social guest injured otherwise than by condition of premises, 38 ALR4th 200.

Comparative negligence, contributory negligence and assumption of risk in action against owner of store, office, or similar place of business by invitee falling on tracked-in water or snow, 83 ALR5th 589.

§ 34-19-103.
Limitations on landowner’s liability.

Except as specifically recognized by or provided in W.S.

34-19-105

, an owner of land, including a lessee of state land, who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge any person to use the land for recreational purposes does not thereby:

Extend any assurance that the premises are safe for any purpose;

Confer upon the person using the land the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed;

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any damage or injury to person or property, including to a third party, whether or not on the property, caused by an act or omission of the person using the land.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 9, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.3; Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 2; 2019 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), added "including a lessee of state land" following "an owner of land" and substituted "recreational purposes does not" for "recreational purposes or a lessee of state lands does not," and in (a)(iii), substituted "any damage or injury" for "any injury," added "including to a third party, whether or not on the property" following "or property," and substituted "act or omission" for "act of omission."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public rights of recreational boating, fishing, wading, or the like in inland stream the bed of which is privately owned, 6 ALR4th 1030.

Modern status of rules conditioning landowner's liability upon status of injured party as invitee, licensee, or trespasser, 22 ALR4th 294.

§ 34-19-104.
Application to land leased to state or political subdivision thereof.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing W.S.

34-19-102

and

34-19-103

shall be deemed applicable to the duties and liability of:

An owner of land leased to the state or any subdivision of this state for recreational purposes;

An owner of land on which the state or any subdivision of the state has an easement for vehicle parking and land access for recreational purposes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 9, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.4; Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 2; 2009, ch. 47, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing paragraph as (a) and (a)(i), added (a)(ii) and made related changes.

Editor's notes.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-19-105.
When landowner's liability not limited.

Nothing in this act limits in any way any liability which otherwise exists:

For willful or malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity, except an owner whose land is adjacent to a national scenic trail designated by the United States congress and who has conveyed an easement across his lands for purposes of a designated national scenic trail shall owe no duty of care to keep the adjacent lands safe or to give any warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure or activity on the adjacent lands. The installation of a sign, other form of warning or modification made to improve safety shall not create liability on the part of an owner of the adjacent land if there is no other basis for liability;

For injury suffered in any case where the owner of land charges the persons who enter or go on the land for recreational purposes, except that in the case of land leased to the state or a subdivision of this state, any consideration received by the owner for the lease shall not be deemed a charge within the meaning of this section;

Under W.S.

1-39-107

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 9, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.5; Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 2; 2005, ch. 50, § 2; 2013 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendment

added the exception in (a)(i) and the related provision.

Laws 2005, ch. 50, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-19-101(a)(v).

Duty of care of national park service. —

Where the national park service of the department of the interior of the United States of America was foreclosed by its own regulation from charging any fee to plaintiff, it owed no duty of care to plaintiff to keep the premises, a national park, safe for his entry or his use for recreational purposes, nor did it owe any duty to give him any warning of any dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the premises because he was entering for recreational purposes. Smith v. United States, 383 F. Supp. 1076, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6035 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 546 F.2d 872, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 5711 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public rights of recreational boating, fishing, wading, or the like in inland stream the bed of which is privately owned, 6 ALR4th 1030.

Liability of owner of store, office, or similar place of business to invitee falling on tracked-in water or snow, 20 ALR4th 438.

Modern status of rules conditioning landowner's liability upon status of injured party as invitee, licensee, or trespasser, 22 ALR4th 294.

Comparative negligence, contributory negligence and assumption of risk in action against owner of store, office, or similar place of business by invitee falling on tracked-in water or snow, 83 ALR5th 589.

§ 34-19-106.
Duty of care, not created; duty of care of persons using land.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to:

Create a duty of care or ground of liability for injury to persons or property;

Relieve any person using the land of another for recreational purposes from any obligation which he may have in the absence of this act to exercise care in his use of the land and in his activities on the land, or from the legal consequences of failure to employ such care.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 9, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 324-389.6; Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-19-101(a)(v).

Even as invitee, 14-year-old visitor to Yellowstone National Park owed reciprocal duty to park service

to exercise ordinary care to avoid injuring himself. Smith v. United States, 546 F.2d 872, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 5711 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

Stated

in

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public rights of recreational boating, fishing, wading, or the like in inland stream the bed of which is privately owned, 6 ALR4th 1030.

Comparative negligence, contributory negligence and assumption of risk in action against owner of store, office, or similar place of business by invitee falling on tracked-in water or snow, 83 ALR5th 589.

§ 34-19-107.
User liability for damages.

Any person using the land of another for recreational purposes, with or without permission, shall assume the inherent risk of using the land for recreational purposes and shall be liable for any damage or injury to property, livestock or crops or to a third party, whether or not on the property, caused by the person while on the property.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 50, § 1; 2019 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 50, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added "shall assume the inherent risk of using the land for recreational purposes and" preceding "shall be liable," substituted "any damage or injury" for "any damage," and substituted "crops or to a third party, whether or not on the property" for "crops which may be."